src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
hakanen:haka n_22_inen_odd ;
orpinen:orpi n_22_inen_odd ;
päänalanen:pään#ala n_22_inen_odd ;
palanen:pala n_22_inen_odd ;
ystävykset:ystävy n_22_excns_even_pl ;
kirjanoppinu:kirjan#oppin n_32_nu ;
halkkeeminen:halkkeemi n_22_inen ;
myötäoleminen:myötä#olemi n_22_inen ;
totheenpaneminen:totheen#panemi n_22_inen ;
työntäminen:työntämi n_22_inen ;
väjenlaskeminen+Err/Orth:väen#laskemi n_22_inen ;
hallitteminen:hallittemi n_22_inen_odd ;
kukastaminen:kukastami n_22_inen_odd ;
soppeutuminen:soppeutumi n_22_inen_odd ;
mustasiipinen:musta#siipi n_22_inen_odd ;
kokonhainen:kokonhai n_22_inen ;
kuukhainen:kuukhai n_22_inen_odd ;
munhainen:munhai n_22_inen_odd ;
päänalunen:pään#alu n_22_inen_odd ;
kuuleminen:kuulemi n_22_inen ;
areaalihäiritteminen:areaali#häirittemi n_22_inen_odd ;
lausuminen:lausumi n_22_inen ;
rehunhakeminen:rehun#hakemi n_22_inen ;
uuđestipitäminen:uuđesti#pitämi n_22_inen ;
voimhaanastuminen:voimhaan#astumi n_22_inen ;
pattoominen:pattoomi n_22_inen ;
troolaaminen:troolaami n_22_inen ;
loppiainen:loppiai n_22_inen ;
kraviaiset:kraviai n_22_inen_pl_even ;
olympialaiset:olympialai n_22_inen_pl_even ;
vesikaari-ihmiset:vesikaari-#ihmi n_22_inen_pl ;
satheenkaari-ihmiset:satheenkaari-#ihmi n_22_inen_pl ;
karviainen:karviai n_22_inen ;
vaaloharjainen:vaalo#harjai n_22_inen_odd ;
pakkainen:pakkai n_22_inen_odd ;
pulmukainen:pulmukai n_22_inen ;
pörhöinen:pörhöi n_22_inen_odd ;
singalilainen:singalilai n_22_inen_odd ;
vatjalainen:vatjalai n_22_inen ;
varenkilainen:varenkilai n_22_inen_odd ;
aasialainen:aasialai n_22_inen_odd ;
ruijalainen:ruijalai n_22_inen ;
saivolainen:saivolai n_22_inen ;
pohjaisnorjalainen:pohjaisnorjalai n_22_inen ;
tanskalainen:tanskalai n_22_inen ;
manalainen:manalai n_22_inen ;
jääpalainen:jää#palai n_22_inen_odd ;
seuralainen:seuralai n_22_inen ;
tromssalainen:tromssalai n_22_inen ;
juutalainen:juutalai n_22_inen ;
inarinsaamelainen:inarinsaamelai n_22_inen ;
piitimensaamelainen:piitimen#saamelai n_22_inen ;
ylisaamelainen:yli#saamelai n_22_inen ;
kaupunkilainen:kaupunkilai n_22_inen ;
talosvankkalainen:talos#vankkalai n_22_inen ;
unkarilainen:unkarilai n_22_inen ;
mustilainen:mustilai n_22_inen ;
nordlandilainen:nordlandilai n_22_inen_odd ;
koutokeinolainen:koutokeinolai n_22_inen ;
sukulainen:sukulai n_22_inen ;
apulainen:apulai n_22_inen ;
läpikäyminen:läpi#käymi n_22_inen_odd ;
käyminen:käymi n_22_inen_odd ;
transnainen:trans#nai n_22_inen ;
osanottaaminen:osanottaami n_22_inen ;
tulkitteminen:tulkittemi n_22_inen_odd ;
läpivieminen:läpi#viemi n_22_inen_odd ;
sisälyttäminen:sisälyttämi n_22_inen ;
seulavaiset:seulavai n_22_inen_pl ;
tervheiset:tervhei n_22_inen_pl ;
loppiinen:loppii n_22_inen_odd ;
mettiinen:mettii n_22_inen_odd ;
talvipalkinen:talvi#palki n_22_inen_odd ;
vaaskinen:vaaski n_22_inen_odd ;
kielinen:kieli n_22_inen_odd ;
rikolinen:rikoli n_22_inen ;
päälinen:pääli n_22_inen_odd ;
raasanmäärittäminen:raasan#määrittämi n_22_inen_odd ;
tienrakentaminen:tien#rakentami n_22_inen_odd ;
oornaaminen:oornaami n_22_inen ;
huntteeraaminen:huntteeraami n_22_inen_odd ;
kiussaaminen:kiussaami n_22_inen ;
kuvvaaminen:kuvvaami n_22_inen ;
rattastaminen:rattastami n_22_inen_odd ;
haamustaminen:haamustami n_22_inen_odd ;
pellaaminen:pellaami n_22_inen ;
ođottaminen:ođottami n_22_inen_odd ;
lukuttaminen:lukuttami n_22_inen_odd ;
aukaiseminen:aukaisemi n_22_inen_odd ;
valitteminen:valittemi n_22_inen_odd ;
vieroihminen:viero#ihmi n_22_inen_odd ;
siviili-ihminen:siviili-#ihmi n_22_inen_odd ;
johtaminen:johtami n_22_inen ;
kokkoominen:kokkoomi n_22_inen ;
ylöskassuuminen:ylös#kassuumi n_22_inen ;
personaalin% kehittäminen:personaalin% #kehittämi n_22_inen_odd ;
pyytäminen:pyytämi n_22_inen ;
kaksoinen:kaksoi n_22_inen_odd ;
urppinen:urppi n_22_inen_odd ;
suvinen:suvi n_22_inen_odd ;
törmiäinen:törmiäi n_22_inen ;
ristiäiset:ristiäi n_22_inen_pl_even ;
hautajaiset:hautajai n_22_inen_pl_even ;
kuukautiset:kuukauti n_22_inen_pl_even ;
leiriläinen:leiriläi n_22_inen ;
eteläläinen:eteläläi n_22_inen_odd ;
syöpäläinen:syöpäläi n_22_inen ;
lahhoominen:lahhoomi n_22_inen ;
asuttamislaajeneminen:asuttamis#laajenemi n_22_inen_odd ;
shoppaileminen:shoppailemi n_22_inen_odd ;
peipponen:peippo n_22_inen_odd ;
sisarukset:sisaru n_22_excns_even_pl ;
pitunen:pitu n_22_inen_odd ;
